North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 1. Apportionment of Members; Compensation and Allowances.

§ 120-1.
Senators.

For the purpose of nominating and electing members of the Senate in 2022, senatorial districts are established and seats in the Senate are apportioned among those districts so that each district elects one senator, and the composition of each district is as follows:

District 1: Carteret County, Chowan County, Dare County, Hyde County, Pamlico County, Pasquotank County, Perquimans County, Washington County.

District 2: Beaufort County, Craven County, Lenoir County.

District 3: Bertie County, Camden County, Currituck County, Gates County, Halifax County, Hertford County, Martin County, Northampton County, Tyrrell County, Warren County.

District 4: Greene County, Wayne County, Wilson County.

District 5: Edgecombe County, Pitt County.

District 6: Onslow County.

District 7: New Hanover County: VTD CF01, VTD CF02, VTD CF05, VTD CF06, VTD FP03, VTD FP04, VTD FP06, VTD FP07, VTD FP08, VTD H01, VTD H02, VTD H03, VTD H04, VTD H05, VTD H06, VTD H08, VTD H10, VTD H11, VTD H12, VTD H13, VTD M02, VTD M03, VTD M04, VTD M06, VTD M07, VTD W12, VTD W13, VTD W15, VTD W16, VTD W17, VTD W18, VTD W21, VTD W24, VTD W25, VTD W27, VTD W28, VTD W29, VTD W31, VTD WB.

District 8: Brunswick County, Columbus County, New Hanover County: VTD W03, VTD W08, VTD W26, VTD W30.

District 9: Bladen County, Duplin County, Jones County, Pender County, Sampson County: VTD AUTR, VTD CLCE, VTD CLEA, VTD CLEM, VTD CLNE, VTD CLSW, VTD CLWE, VTD GARL, VTD GIDD, VTD HARR, VTD HERR, VTD INGO, VTD KEEN, VTD KFRK, VTD LAKE, VTD MING, VTD NGRV, VTD ROSE, VTD ROWA, VTD SBRG, VTD TURK, VTD WBRK.

District 10: Johnston County.

District 11: Franklin County, Nash County, Vance County.

District 12: Harnett County, Lee County, Sampson County: VTD PLVW.

District 13: Wake County: VTD 01-15, VTD 01-17, VTD 01-18, VTD 01-30, VTD 01-36, VTD 01-37, VTD 01-38, VTD 01-39, VTD 01-42, VTD 01-43, VTD 01-44, VTD 01-45, VTD 01-46, VTD 01-47, VTD 01-51, VTD 02-01, VTD 02-05, VTD 02-06, VTD 07-02, VTD 07-03, VTD 07-04, VTD 07-05, VTD 07-06, VTD 07-07, VTD 07-09, VTD 07-11, VTD 07-12, VTD 07-13, VTD 08-02, VTD 08-03, VTD 08-04, VTD 08-05, VTD 08-06, VTD 08-07, VTD 08-08, VTD 08-09, VTD 08-10, VTD 08-11, VTD 13-01, VTD 13-02, VTD 13-05, VTD 13-06, VTD 13-07, VTD 13-08, VTD 13-11, VTD 17-01: Block(s) 1830527061000, 1830527061001, 1830527061002, 1830527061003, 1830527061004, 1830527061005, 1830527061006, 1830527061007, 1830527061008, 1830527061009, 1830527061010, 1830527061011, 1830527061012, 1830527061013, 1830527061014, 1830527061015, 1830527061016, 1830527061017, 1830527061018, 1830527061019, 1830527061020, 1830527062000, 1830527062001, 1830527062002, 1830527062003, 1830527062004, 1830527062005, 1830527062023, 1830527062024, 1830527062025, 1830527062026, 1830527062033, 1830527062034, 1830527062035, 1830527072009, 1830527072010, 1830527072012, 1830527072016, 1830527072017, 1830527072018, 1830527072019, 1830527072020, 1830527072022, 1830527072023; VTD 17-10, VTD 17-11.

District 14: Wake County: VTD 01-19, VTD 01-20, VTD 01-22, VTD 01-26, VTD 01-34, VTD 01-35, VTD 01-40, VTD 01-50, VTD 09-01, VTD 09-02, VTD 09-03, VTD 10-01, VTD 10-02, VTD 10-03, VTD 10-04, VTD 16-01, VTD 16-02, VTD 16-03, VTD 16-04, VTD 16-06, VTD 16-07, VTD 16-09, VTD 16-10, VTD 16-11, VTD 17-01: Block(s) 1830527062006, 1830527062007, 1830527062008, 1830527062009, 1830527062010, 1830527062011, 1830527062020, 1830527062021, 1830527062022, 1830527062027, 1830527062028, 1830527062029, 1830527062030, 1830527062031, 1830527062032, 1830527062036, 1830527062037, 1830541064018; VTD 17-02, VTD 17-03, VTD 17-04, VTD 17-05, VTD 17-06, VTD 17-07, VTD 17-09, VTD 17-12, VTD 17-13.

District 15: Wake County: VTD 01-01, VTD 01-02, VTD 01-03, VTD 01-04, VTD 01-05, VTD 01-06, VTD 01-07, VTD 01-09, VTD 01-10, VTD 01-11, VTD 01-12, VTD 01-13, VTD 01-14, VTD 01-16, VTD 01-21, VTD 01-23, VTD 01-25, VTD 01-27, VTD 01-28, VTD 01-29, VTD 01-31, VTD 01-32, VTD 01-33, VTD 01-41, VTD 01-48, VTD 01-49, VTD 04-02, VTD 04-03, VTD 04-06, VTD 04-11: Block(s) 1830535172001, 1830535172002, 1830535172003, 1830535173001, 1830535173002, 1830535174003, 1830535174004, 1830535174005, 1830535174009, 1830535174010, 1830535174011, 1830535174012, 1830535174013, 1830535174014, 1830535174017; VTD 04-12, VTD 07-01, VTD 11-01, VTD 11-02, VTD 16-05, VTD 18-01, VTD 18-02, VTD 18-03, VTD 18-04, VTD 18-05, VTD 18-06, VTD 18-07, VTD 18-08.

District 16: Wake County: VTD 04-01, VTD 04-04, VTD 04-05, VTD 04-07, VTD 04-08, VTD 04-09, VTD 04-10, VTD 04-11: Block(s) 1830535172000, 1830535174000, 1830535174001, 1830535174002, 1830535174006, 1830535174007, 1830535174008, 1830535174015, 1830535174016, 1830535201000, 1830535201001, 1830535201002, 1830535201003, 1830535201004, 1830535201005, 1830535201006, 1830535201007, 1830535201009, 1830535201010, 1830535201011, 1830535201012, 1830535201015, 1830535201016, 1830535201017, 1830535201018, 1830535201019, 1830535203016, 1830535203017; VTD 04-13, VTD 04-14, VTD 04-15, VTD 04-16, VTD 04-17, VTD 04-18, VTD 04-19, VTD 04-20, VTD 04-21, VTD 05-01, VTD 05-03, VTD 05-05, VTD 05-06, VTD 05-07, VTD 05-08, VTD 07-10, VTD 20-03, VTD 20-04, VTD 20-08: Block(s) 1830534091000, 1830534091001, 1830534091002, 1830534091003, 1830534091004, 1830534091005, 1830534091006, 1830534091007, 1830534091008, 1830534091009, 1830534091010, 1830534091011, 1830534091012, 1830534091013, 1830534091014, 1830534091015, 1830534091016, 1830534091017, 1830534091018, 1830534091019, 1830534091020, 1830534091021, 1830534091022, 1830534091023, 1830534091024, 1830534091025, 1830534091026, 1830534292015, 1830534292046, 1830534292047, 1830534292051, 1830534292054, 1830534301000, 1830534301001, 1830534301002, 1830534301003, 1830534301004, 1830534301005, 1830534301006, 1830534301007, 1830534301008, 1830534301009, 1830534301010, 1830534301011, 1830534301012, 1830534301013, 1830534301014, 1830534301015, 1830534301016, 1830534301017, 1830534301018, 1830534301019, 1830534301020, 1830534302000, 1830534302001, 1830534302002, 1830534302003, 1830534302004, 1830534302005, 1830534302006, 1830534302007, 1830534303000, 1830534303001, 1830534303002, 1830534303003, 1830534303004, 1830534303005, 1830534303006, 1830534303007, 1830534303008, 1830534303009, 1830534303010, 1830534303011, 1830534303012, 1830534303013, 1830534303014; VTD 20-09, VTD 20-10, VTD 20-14, VTD 20-15, VTD 20-16, VTD 20-17.

District 17: Wake County: VTD 03-00, VTD 06-04, VTD 06-05, VTD 06-06, VTD 06-07, VTD 06-08, VTD 06-09, VTD 06-10, VTD 12-01, VTD 12-02, VTD 12-04, VTD 12-05, VTD 12-06, VTD 12-07, VTD 12-08, VTD 12-09, VTD 15-01, VTD 15-02, VTD 15-03, VTD 15-04, VTD 20-01, VTD 20-05, VTD 20-06A, VTD 20-06B, VTD 20-08: Block(s) 1830534291001, 1830534291002, 1830534291003, 1830534291004, 1830534291005, 1830534291006, 1830534291007, 1830534291008, 1830534291009, 1830534291010, 1830534291011, 1830534291015, 1830534292048, 1830534292049, 1830534292050, 1830534292052, 1830534292053; VTD 20-11, VTD 20-12.

District 18: Granville County, Wake County: VTD 02-02, VTD 02-03, VTD 02-04, VTD 13-09, VTD 13-10, VTD 14-01, VTD 14-02, VTD 19-03, VTD 19-05, VTD 19-07, VTD 19-09, VTD 19-11, VTD 19-12, VTD 19-13, VTD 19-14, VTD 19-15, VTD 19-16, VTD 19-17, VTD 19-18, VTD 19-19, VTD 19-20, VTD 19-21.

District 19: Cumberland County: VTD AH49, VTD AL51, VTD CC01, VTD CC04, VTD CC10, VTD CC15, VTD CC18, VTD CC19, VTD CC24, VTD CC25, VTD CC26, VTD CC27, VTD CC29, VTD CC31, VTD CC34, VTD CL57-2, VTD CU02, VTD EO61-1, VTD EO61-2, VTD G10A, VTD G10B, VTD G10C, VTD G1A, VTD G1B, VTD G3A-1, VTD G3A-2, VTD G3B, VTD G3C, VTD G4A, VTD G4B, VTD G4C, VTD G5A-1, VTD G5A-2, VTD G5B-1, VTD G5B-2, VTD G5C, VTD G6A, VTD G6B, VTD G6C, VTD G7A, VTD G7B, VTD G8A, VTD G8B, VTD G8C, VTD G8D, VTD G9A, VTD G9B-1, VTD G9B-2, VTD LI65, VTD LR63, VTD MB62, VTD SH77.

District 20: Chatham County, Durham County: VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 016, VTD 027, VTD 031, VTD 033, VTD 038, VTD 039, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 047, VTD 048, VTD 051, VTD 054, VTD 055-11, VTD 055-49, VTD 34-1, VTD 34-2, VTD 35.3, VTD 53-1, VTD 53-2.

District 21: Cumberland County: VTD CC03, VTD CC05, VTD CC06, VTD CC07, VTD CC08, VTD CC12, VTD CC13, VTD CC14, VTD CC16, VTD CC17, VTD CC21, VTD CC32, VTD CC33, VTD CL57-1, VTD G11B, VTD G2A, VTD G2B, VTD G2C-1, VTD G2C-2, VTD G2D, VTD G2E-1, VTD G2E-2, VTD MR02, VTD SL78-3; Moore County.

District 22: Durham County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 015, VTD 017, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 032, VTD 036, VTD 037, VTD 040, VTD 043, VTD 044, VTD 045, VTD 046, VTD 050, VTD 052, VTD 30-1, VTD 30-2.

District 23: Caswell County, Orange County, Person County.

District 24: Hoke County, Robeson County, Scotland County.

District 25: Alamance County, Randolph County: VTD DR, VTD LB, VTD LC, VTD NM, VTD PR, VTD RM, VTD RN, VTD ST.

District 26: Guilford County: VTD CG1, VTD CG2, VTD CG3B, VTD GIB, VTD GR, VTD JEF1, VTD JEF2, VTD JEF3, VTD JEF4, VTD MON1, VTD MON2A, VTD MON2B, VTD MON3, VTD NCGR1, VTD NCGR2, VTD NCLAY1, VTD NCLAY2, VTD NMAD, VTD NWASH, VTD OR1, VTD OR2, VTD RC1, VTD RC2, VTD SCLAY, VTD SF1, VTD SF2, VTD SF3, VTD SF4, VTD SMAD, VTD STOK, VTD SWASH; Rockingham County.

District 27: Guilford County: VTD FEN1, VTD FEN2, VTD FR1, VTD FR2, VTD FR3, VTD FR4, VTD FR5A, VTD FR5B, VTD G40A2, VTD G41A, VTD G41B, VTD G42A, VTD G42B, VTD G43, VTD G62, VTD G63, VTD G64, VTD G65, VTD G66, VTD H01, VTD H02, VTD H03, VTD H04, VTD H05, VTD H06, VTD H07, VTD H08, VTD H09, VTD H10, VTD H11, VTD H12, VTD H13, VTD H14, VTD H15, VTD H16, VTD H17, VTD H18, VTD H19A, VTD H19B, VTD H20A, VTD H20B, VTD H21, VTD H22, VTD H23, VTD H24, VTD H25, VTD H26, VTD H27-A, VTD H27-B, VTD H28, VTD H29A, VTD H29B, VTD JAM1, VTD JAM2, VTD JAM3, VTD JAM4, VTD JAM5, VTD NDRI, VTD PG1, VTD PG2, VTD SDRI, VTD SUM1, VTD SUM2, VTD SUM3, VTD SUM4.

District 28: Guilford County: VTD CG3A, VTD G01, VTD G02, VTD G03, VTD G04, VTD G05, VTD G06, VTD G07, VTD G08, VTD G09, VTD G10, VTD G11, VTD G12, VTD G13, VTD G14, VTD G15, VTD G16, VTD G17, VTD G18, VTD G19, VTD G20, VTD G21, VTD G22, VTD G23, VTD G24, VTD G25, VTD G26, VTD G27, VTD G28, VTD G29, VTD G30, VTD G31, VTD G32, VTD G33, VTD G34, VTD G35, VTD G36, VTD G37, VTD G38, VTD G39, VTD G40A1, VTD G40B, VTD G44, VTD G45, VTD G46, VTD G47, VTD G48, VTD G49, VTD G50, VTD G51, VTD G52, VTD G53, VTD G54, VTD G55, VTD G56, VTD G57, VTD G58, VTD G59, VTD G60, VTD G61, VTD G67, VTD G68, VTD G69, VTD G70, VTD G71, VTD G72, VTD G73, VTD G74, VTD G75.

District 29: Anson County, Montgomery County, Randolph County: VTD AE, VTD AN, VTD AR, VTD AS, VTD AW, VTD BC, VTD GR, VTD SE, VTD SO, VTD SW, VTD TB, VTD TR, VTD TT, VTD UG; Richmond County, Union County: VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 036.

District 30: Davidson County, Davie County.

District 31: Forsyth County: VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 021, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 042, VTD 043, VTD 061, VTD 062, VTD 063, VTD 064, VTD 065, VTD 066, VTD 067, VTD 068, VTD 081, VTD 082, VTD 083, VTD 091, VTD 092, VTD 101, VTD 111, VTD 112, VTD 201, VTD 206, VTD 207, VTD 306, VTD 401, VTD 501, VTD 502, VTD 504, VTD 505, VTD 507, VTD 904, VTD 905; Stokes County.

District 32: Forsyth County: VTD 051, VTD 052, VTD 053, VTD 054, VTD 055, VTD 071, VTD 072, VTD 073, VTD 074, VTD 075, VTD 122, VTD 123, VTD 131, VTD 132, VTD 133, VTD 203, VTD 204, VTD 205, VTD 301, VTD 302, VTD 303, VTD 304, VTD 305, VTD 402, VTD 403, VTD 404, VTD 405, VTD 503, VTD 506, VTD 601, VTD 602, VTD 603, VTD 604, VTD 605, VTD 606, VTD 607, VTD 701, VTD 702, VTD 703, VTD 704, VTD 705, VTD 706, VTD 707, VTD 708, VTD 709, VTD 801, VTD 802, VTD 803, VTD 804, VTD 805, VTD 806, VTD 807, VTD 808, VTD 809, VTD 901, VTD 902, VTD 903, VTD 906, VTD 907, VTD 908, VTD 909.

District 33: Rowan County, Stanly County.

District 34: Cabarrus County: VTD 01-02, VTD 01-04, VTD 01-07, VTD 01-08, VTD 01-10, VTD 01-11, VTD 02-01, VTD 02-02, VTD 02-03, VTD 02-05, VTD 02-06, VTD 02-07, VTD 02-08, VTD 02-09, VTD 03-00, VTD 04-01, VTD 04-03, VTD 04-08, VTD 04-09, VTD 04-11, VTD 04-12, VTD 04-13, VTD 05-00, VTD 06-00, VTD 07-00, VTD 08-00, VTD 09-00, VTD 11-01, VTD 11-02, VTD 12-03, VTD 12-04, VTD 12-05, VTD 12-06, VTD 12-08, VTD 12-09, VTD 12-10, VTD 12-11, VTD 12-12, VTD 12-13.

District 35: Cabarrus County: VTD 10-00; Union County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 023, VTD 030, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 043, VTD 17A, VTD 17B, VTD 20A, VTD 20B, VTD 28A, VTD 28B, VTD 28C, VTD 28D, VTD 29A, VTD 29B, VTD 29C, VTD 37A, VTD 37B, VTD 38A, VTD 38B.

District 36: Alexander County, Surry County, Wilkes County, Yadkin County.

District 37: Iredell County, Mecklenburg County: VTD 142, VTD 208, VTD 240, VTD 242.

District 38: Mecklenburg County: VTD 005, VTD 007, VTD 011, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 017, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 042, VTD 044, VTD 045, VTD 046, VTD 054, VTD 055, VTD 056, VTD 082, VTD 107.1, VTD 109, VTD 126, VTD 128, VTD 135, VTD 145, VTD 146, VTD 151, VTD 212, VTD 213, VTD 214, VTD 238.1, VTD 239.

District 39: Mecklenburg County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 032, VTD 035, VTD 037, VTD 038, VTD 047, VTD 048, VTD 049, VTD 050, VTD 051, VTD 052, VTD 057, VTD 058, VTD 059, VTD 071, VTD 074, VTD 075, VTD 076, VTD 077, VTD 097, VTD 098, VTD 114, VTD 120, VTD 122, VTD 138, VTD 147, VTD 225, VTD 228, VTD 229, VTD 230, VTD 243, VTD 78.1.

District 40: Mecklenburg County: VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 006, VTD 043, VTD 060, VTD 061, VTD 062, VTD 063, VTD 083, VTD 084, VTD 094, VTD 095, VTD 102, VTD 104, VTD 105, VTD 108, VTD 115, VTD 116, VTD 123, VTD 124, VTD 125, VTD 130, VTD 132, VTD 141, VTD 149, VTD 201, VTD 203, VTD 204.1, VTD 205, VTD 216, VTD 218, VTD 219, VTD 220, VTD 221, VTD 234, VTD 235, VTD 236, VTD 237.

District 41: Mecklenburg County: VTD 012, VTD 016, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 031, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 053, VTD 079, VTD 080, VTD 081, VTD 089, VTD 127, VTD 133, VTD 134, VTD 143, VTD 150, VTD 200, VTD 202, VTD 206, VTD 207, VTD 209, VTD 210, VTD 211, VTD 222, VTD 223.1, VTD 224, VTD 241.

District 42: Mecklenburg County: VTD 036, VTD 064, VTD 065, VTD 066, VTD 067, VTD 068, VTD 069, VTD 070, VTD 072, VTD 073, VTD 085, VTD 086, VTD 087, VTD 088, VTD 090, VTD 091, VTD 092, VTD 093, VTD 096, VTD 099, VTD 100, VTD 101, VTD 103, VTD 106, VTD 110, VTD 111, VTD 112, VTD 113, VTD 117, VTD 118, VTD 119, VTD 121, VTD 129, VTD 131, VTD 136, VTD 137, VTD 139.1, VTD 140, VTD 144, VTD 148, VTD 215, VTD 217, VTD 226, VTD 227, VTD 231, VTD 232, VTD 233.

District 43: Gaston County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 038, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 043, VTD 044, VTD 045, VTD 046.

District 44: Cleveland County, Gaston County: VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 037; Lincoln County.

District 45: Caldwell County: VTD PR13, VTD PR14, VTD PR16, VTD PR17, VTD PR18, VTD PR21, VTD PR22, VTD PR24, VTD PR25, VTD PR29, VTD PR33, VTD PR34, VTD PR35; Catawba County.

District 46: Buncombe County: VTD 23.3, VTD 32.1, VTD 33.2, VTD 33.3, VTD 34.1, VTD 35.1, VTD 36.1, VTD 37.1, VTD 38.2, VTD 38.3, VTD 39.2, VTD 39.3, VTD 40.2, VTD 50.1, VTD 51.2, VTD 58.1, VTD 59.1, VTD 60.2, VTD 61.1, VTD 62.1, VTD 64.1, VTD 65.1, VTD 66.1, VTD 67.1; Burke County, McDowell County.

District 47: Alleghany County, Ashe County, Avery County, Caldwell County: VTD PR01, VTD PR02, VTD PR07, VTD PR08, VTD PR30, VTD PR31, VTD PR32; Haywood County: VTD BE-1, VTD BE-2, VTD BE-3, VTD BE-4, VTD BE-7, VTD BE56, VTD CL-N, VTD CL-S, VTD CR, VTD FC-1, VTD FC-2, VTD WO; Madison County, Mitchell County, Watauga County, Yancey County.

District 48: Henderson County, Polk County, Rutherford County.

District 49: Buncombe County: VTD 1.1, VTD 10.1, VTD 11.1, VTD 12.1, VTD 13.1, VTD 14.2, VTD 14.3, VTD 15.1, VTD 16.2, VTD 17.1, VTD 18.2, VTD 19.1, VTD 2.1, VTD 20.1, VTD 21.1, VTD 22.2, VTD 23.2, VTD 24.1, VTD 25.1, VTD 26.1, VTD 27.2, VTD 28.1, VTD 29.2, VTD 3.1, VTD 30.2, VTD 30.3, VTD 31.1, VTD 4.1, VTD 41.1, VTD 42.1, VTD 43.2, VTD 44.1, VTD 45.1, VTD 46.1, VTD 47.1, VTD 48.1, VTD 49.1, VTD 5.1, VTD 52.1, VTD 53.1, VTD 54.2, VTD 55.1, VTD 56.2, VTD 57.1, VTD 6.1, VTD 60.4, VTD 63.1, VTD 68.1, VTD 69.1, VTD 7.1, VTD 70.1, VTD 71.1, VTD 8.2, VTD 8.3, VTD 9.1.

District 50: Cherokee County, Clay County, Graham County, Haywood County: VTD AC, VTD BC, VTD CE, VTD EF, VTD HA, VTD ID, VTD IH, VTD JC, VTD LJ, VTD P, VTD PC, VTD SA, VTD WC, VTD WE, VTD WS-1, VTD WS-2, VTD WW; Jackson County, Macon County, Swain County, Transylvania County.

The names and boundaries of voting tabulation districts, tracts, block groups, and blocks specified in this section are as shown on the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

If any voting tabulation district boundary is changed, that change shall not change the boundary of a senatorial district, which shall remain the same as it is depicted by the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-413, s. 2, effective November 7, 2011, and applicable to elections held on or after January 1, 2012.

The Legislative Services Officer shall certify a true copy of the block assignment file associated with any mapping software used to generate the language in subsection (a) of this section. The certified true copy of the block assignment file shall be delivered by the Legislative Services Officer to the Principal Clerk of the Senate. If any area within North Carolina is not assigned to a specific district by subsection (a) of this section, the certified true copy of the block assignment file delivered to the Principal Clerk of the Senate shall control.

History.

Code, s. 2844; Rev., s. 4398; 1911, c. 150; C.S., s. 6087; 1921, c. 161; 1941, c. 225; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1966, Ex. Sess., c. 1, s. 1; 1971, c. 1177; 1981, c. 821; 1982, Ex. Sess., c. 5; 1982, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 2; 1984, Ex. Sess., c. 4, ss. 1-3; c. 5, ss. 1-4; 1991, c. 676, s. 1; 1991, Ex. Sess., c. 4, ss. 1, 2; 2001-458, ss. 1, 2; 2001-487, s. 121.5; 2002-1, Ex. Sess., s. 3.1; 2003-434, 1st Ex. Sess., ss. 3, 4; 2011-402, s. 1; 2011-413, s. 2; 2017-207, s. 1; 2019-219, s. 1; 2021-173, s. 1; 2022-2, s. 1.

District Plans for 2002 Elections.

Session Laws 2002-1 enacted a House Redistricting Plan (“Proposed House Plan - Sutton 5”) and a Senate Redistricting Plan (“Proposed Senate Plan - Fewer Divided Counties”), which were created to correct constitutional deficiencies found by the
North Carolina Supreme Court in Stephenson v. Bartlett,

355 N.C. 354

, 562 S.E.2d 377 (2002), in Sutton House Plan 3 (enacted by Session Laws 2001-458) and in NC Senate Plan 1C (enacted by Session Laws 2001-459). The House and Senate Redistricting Plans were ratified on May 17, 2002, and became Session Laws 2002-1 on May 20, 2002.

Both plans were subsequently held constitutionally invalid by the North Carolina Superior Court in Stephenson v. Bartlett, No. 01 CVS 2885 (N.C. Sup. Ct. May 31, 2002).
In their place, the North Carolina Superior Court, on May 31, 2002, presented “Interim House Redistricting Plan for NC 2002 Elections” and “Interim Senate Redistricting Plan for NC 2002 Elections,” and ordered that, upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, the plans be immediately implemented so that the election process could proceed forthwith.
Preclearance was received from the United States Department of Justice by letter dated July 12, 2002.